Massachusetts, session 194th, S2997.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Massachusetts state lottery is hereby authorized and directed to conduct a
comprehensive study into digital pull tabs, for the purpose of determining whether they should
be legalized and regulated in the state of Massachusetts for charitable use. In carrying out the
provisions of this act, the lottery shall consult with those engaged in the production of digital pull
tab technology and owners and relevant staff of nonprofit organizations eligible for charitable
gaming in the Commonwealth including but not limited to veterans organizations.
The Massachusetts state lottery shall file the results of said study, together with any
recommendations for regulatory or legislative actions, with the clerks of the House and Senate
not later than 12 months following the passage of this act.
of 1